Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7672.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-20 of the General Laws entitled "Special Stops Required" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-20-18. Posting bike path stop signs.
The department of transportation, in coordination with the traffic safety commission, shall
on all state highways, erect and maintain adequate signs requiring operators of motor vehicles to
come to a complete stop because of the existence of an intersection of a bike path, and roadway, as
defined in § 31-1-23.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004328
========